Alabama, session 2026rs, HB633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-28-121 of the Code of Alabama
1975, is amended to read as follows:
"§45-28-121
(a) In Etowah County, there is hereby created and
established a personnel department for the government and
control of all employees and appointees holding positions in
the classified service, as defined in Section 45-28-121.03.
(b)(1) The personnel department shall consist of a
personnel board and a personnel director. The personnel board
shall consist of five members. Three members shall be
appointed for a term of six years each as follows: One to be
appointed by
a. Upon the term of the member who is a joint appointee
of the judge of probate judge and the sheriff of the county;
one to be expiring on September 30, 2028, one member appointed
by the judge of probate.
b. Upon the term of the member appointed by the county
commission; and one to be appointed as expiring on September
30, 2030, one member appointed by the county commission upon
the recommendation of the county engineer.
c. Upon the term of the member who is a joint appointee
of the county tax assessor and the county tax collector;
Page 1

of the county tax assessor and the county tax collector;
HB633 Enrolled
however, the terms for the above three named initial
appointees shall be staggered. For the first appointments the
joint appointee of the probate judge and the sheriff of the
county shall be for two years; the first appointee by the
county commission shall be for a term of four years; and the
first joint appointee by the county tax assessor and county
tax collector shall be for six years. The other two members of
the board shall be appointed for one-year terms. One of the
additional members shall be appointed annually expiring on
September 30, 2026, one member appointed by the revenue
commissioner.
d. Upon the term of the member appointed by the
President of the Etowah County Chamber of Commerce; and one
member shall be appointed annually expiring on September 30,
2026, one member appointed by the county commission upon the
recommendation of the chief administrative officer.
e. Upon the term of the member appointed by the
President of the Etowah County Labor Council expiring on
September 30, 2026, one member appointed by the President of
the Northeast Alabama Labor Council.
(2) Subsequent terms on the board shall be for four
years and shall begin on October 1.
(c) The members of the board shall be qualified
electors of the county. No person shall be appointed to the
board who holds any salaried public office or employment with
the county, nor shall any member, while a member of the board
or for a period of one year after he or she has ceased to be a
member, be eligible for appointment to any salaried office or
Page 2

member, be eligible for appointment to any salaried office or
HB633 Enrolled
employment in the service of the county or any county elective
office.
(d) For regular meetings of the board or special
hearings or meetings of the board relating to a pending
disciplinary action, each member shall receive sixty dollars
($60) per diem, not to exceed one hundred eighty dollars
($180) per month paid from the county treasury, and the chair
shall receive seventy-five dollars ($75) per diem, not to
exceed two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) per month paid
from the county treasury."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
HB633 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 09-Apr-26 Passed

100
101
Page 4